Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 10 FOUNDATION PROGRAM — STATE AID — APPORTIONMENT
33-1004. Staff allowance.

For each school district, a staff allowance shall be determined as follows:

Using the daily attendance reports that have been submitted for computing the February 15 apportionment of state funds as provided in section 33-1009, Idaho Code, calculate the total support units for the district in the manner provided in section 33-1002(6)(a), Idaho Code. If the support units used to calculate discretionary funding pursuant to sections 33-1009 and 33-1018, Idaho Code, are at least three percent (3%) greater, seventy-five percent (75%) of the difference shall be added to the support units used for the February 15 apportionment of state funds;

Determine the instructional staff allowance by multiplying the support units by 1.021. A district must demonstrate that it actually employs the number of certificated instructional staff allowed, except as provided in subsection (6)(f) and (g) of this section. If the district does not employ the number allowed, the staff allowance shall be reduced to the actual number employed, except as provided in subsection (6)(f) and (g) of this section;

Determine the pupil service staff allowance by multiplying the support units by 0.079;

Determine the administrative staff allowance by multiplying the support units by .075;

Determine the classified staff allowance by multiplying the support units by .375;

Additional conditions governing staff allowance:

In determining the number of staff in subsections (2), (3), (4) and (5) of this section, a district may contract separately for services to be rendered by nondistrict employees and such employees may be counted in the staff allowance. A “nondistrict employee” means a person for whom the school district does not pay the employer’s obligations for employee benefits. When a district contracts for the services of a nondistrict employee, only the salary portion of the contract shall be allowable for computations.

If there are circumstances preventing eligible use of staff allowance to which a district is entitled as provided in subsections (2), (3) and (4) of this section, an appeal may be filed with the state department of education outlining the reasons and proposed alternative use of these funds, and a waiver may be granted.

For any district with less than forty (40) support units:

The instructional staff allowance shall be calculated applying the actual number of support units. If the actual instructional staff employed in the school year is greater than the instructional staff allowance, then the instructional staff allowance shall be increased by one-half (½) staff allowance; and

The administrative staff allowance shall be calculated applying the actual number of support units. If the actual administrative staff employed in the school year is greater than the administrative staff allowance, then the administrative staff allowance shall be increased by one-half (½) staff allowance.

Additionally, for any district with less than twenty (20) support units, the instructional staff allowance shall be calculated applying the actual number of support units. If the number of instructional staff employed in the school year is greater than the instructional staff allowance, the staff allowance shall be increased as provided in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph, and by an additional one-half (½) instructional staff allowance.
(d) For any school district with one (1) or more separate secondary schools serving grades 9 through 12, the instructional staff allowance shall be increased by two (2) additional instructional staff allowances for each such separate secondary school.

For any school district with one (1) or more separate secondary schools serving grades 9 through 12, the instructional staff allowance shall be increased by two (2) additional instructional staff allowances for each such separate secondary school.

Only instructional, pupil service and administrative staff and classified personnel compensated by the school district from the general maintenance and operation fund of the district shall be included in the calculation of staff allowance or in any other calculations based upon staff, including determination of the experience and education multiplier, the reporting requirements, or the district’s salary-based apportionment calculation. No food service staff or transportation staff shall be included in the staff allowance.

A district may utilize up to fifteen percent (15%) of the moneys associated with positions funded pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to pay another school district or public charter school for instructional services or to defray the cost of providing virtual education coursework, including virtual dual credit coursework, without a reduction in the number of funded positions being imposed.

A district may employ nine and one-half percent (9.5%) fewer positions than funded pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, without a reduction in the number of funded positions being imposed. Beginning in fiscal year 2016, this figure shall be reduced by one percent (1%) each year for each school district in which the average class size, as determined from prior fiscal year data reported to the state department of education, was at least one (1) student greater than the statewide average class size. The state department of education shall report to the legislature every February, beginning in 2015, on the reductions scheduled to take place in this figure, by school district, in the ensuing fiscal year.

In the determination of statewide average class size, the state department of education shall not use a single figure developed through the averaging of all districts of varying size, geographical location and pupil populations throughout the state. The statewide average class size shall be comprised of multiple figures determined through analysis of like and similarly situated districts and use of the divisor breakdown established in section 33-1002, Idaho Code.

The state board of education may promulgate rules outlining the method of calculation of the statewide average class size figures.

The one percent (1%) reduction required in paragraph (g) of this subsection shall not be applicable for any school year subsequent to a year when the school district’s boundaries have changed because of division, consolidation, excision or annexation of territory.

In the event that the staff allowance in any category is insufficient to meet accreditation standards, a district may appeal to the state board of education, demonstrating the insufficiency, and the state board may grant a waiver authorizing sufficient additional staff to be included within the staff allowance to meet accreditation standards. Such a waiver shall be limited to one (1) year, but may be renewed upon showing of continuing justification.

33-1004A. Experience and education multiplier.

Each administrative staff position shall be assigned an appropriate multiplier based upon the following table:

In determining the experience factor, the actual years of certificated service as pupil personnel services staff, teaching and administrative service for administrator certificate holders in a public school, in an accredited private or parochial school, or beginning in the 2005-06 school year and thereafter in an accredited college or university shall be credited.

In determining the education factor, only credits earned after initial certification, based upon a transcript on file with the teacher certification office of the state department of education, earned at an institution of higher education accredited by a body recognized by the state board of education, shall be allowed; however, successful completion of a state approved evaluation training and proof of proficiency shall be counted as up to three (3) transcripted credits for determination of the education factor and meeting recertification requirements.

In determining the statewide average multiplier for administrative staff, no multiplier in excess of 1.86643 shall be used. If the actual statewide average multiplier for administrative staff, as determined by this section, exceeds 1.86643, then each school district’s administrative staff multiplier shall be multiplied by the result of 1.86643 divided by the actual statewide average multiplier for administrative staff.

33-1004B. Career ladder.

School districts shall receive an allocation for instructional staff and pupil service staff based on their staffs’ position on the career ladder as follows:

Instructional staff and pupil service staff who are in their first year of holding a certificate shall be placed in the first cell of the residency compensation rung and shall move one (1) cell on the residency compensation rung for each year they hold a certificate thereafter for up to three (3) years, at which point they will remain in the third cell of the residency rung until they earn a professional endorsement.

Instructional staff and pupil service staff in their first year of holding a professional endorsement shall be placed in the first cell of the professional compensation rung.

Instructional staff and pupil service staff on the professional compensation rung with four (4) years of experience shall move one (1) cell on the professional compensation rung unless they have failed to meet the professional compensation rung performance criteria for three (3) of the previous four (4) years. Instructional staff and pupil service staff on the professional compensation rung who meet the performance criteria for three (3) of the previous five (5) years, one (1) of which must be during the fourth or fifth year, shall move one (1) cell. Allocations for instructional staff and pupil service staff who do not meet the professional compensation rung performance criteria for three (3) of the previous five (5) years, one (1) of which must be during the fourth or fifth year, shall remain at the previous fiscal year allocation level. This also applies to the educational allocation.

Instructional staff and pupil service staff in their first year of holding an advanced professional endorsement shall be placed in the first cell of the advanced professional compensation rung.

Instructional staff and pupil service staff on the advanced professional compensation rung who met the performance criteria for the advanced professional rung in the previous year shall move one (1) cell on the advanced professional compensation rung. Allocations for instructional staff and pupil service staff who do not meet the advanced professional compensation rung performance criteria shall remain at the previous fiscal year allocation level. This also applies to the additional education allocation.

Career technical education instructional staff holding an occupational specialist certificate shall be placed on the career ladder as follows:

Instructional staff new to working in an Idaho public school:

With two (2) or three (3) years of industry experience in a field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for one (1) year;

With four (4) or five (5) years of industry experience in a field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for two (2) years;

With six (6) or seven (7) years of industry experience in a field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for three (3) years; and

With eight (8) or more years of industry experience in a field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for four (4) years; and
(b) Existing career technical education instructional staff on the residency compensation rung shall have their placement updated consistent with the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection if the update would result in a rung higher than their current placement.

(6) In addition to the allocation amount specified for the applicable cell on the career ladder, school districts shall receive an additional allocation amount for career technical education instructional staff holding an occupational specialist certificate in the area for which they are teaching in the amount of three thousand dollars ($3,000), which shall be designated for career technical education staff and included as part of their salary.

(7) In addition to the allocation amount specified for the applicable cell on the career ladder, school districts shall receive an additional allocation amount for instructional staff and pupil service staff holding a professional or an advanced professional endorsement who have acquired additional education and meet the professional or advanced professional compensation rung performance criteria. In determining the additional education allocation amount, only transcripted credits and degrees on file with the teacher certification office of the state department of education, earned at an institution of higher education accredited by a body recognized by the state board of education or credits earned through an internship or work experience approved by the state board of education, shall be allowed. All credits and degrees earned must be in a relevant pedagogy or content area as determined by the state department of education. Additional education allocation amounts are not cumulative. Instructional staff whose initial certificate is an occupational specialist certificate shall be treated as BA degree-prepared instructional staff. Credits earned by such occupational specialist instructional staff after initial certification shall be credited toward the education allocation. Additional education allocations are:

For instructional staff and pupil service staff holding a professional or an advanced professional endorsement, a baccalaureate degree and twenty-four (24) or more credits, two thousand dollars ($2,000) per fiscal year.

For instructional staff and pupil service staff holding a professional or an advanced professional endorsement and a master’s degree, three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per fiscal year.

Effective July 1, 2020, the allocation shall be:

Effective July 1, 2021, the allocation shall be:

Effective July 1, 2022, the allocation shall be:

Effective July 1, 2023, the allocation shall be:

Effective July 1, 2024, the allocation shall be:

(8) Effective July 1, 2025, the educator salary-based apportionment program compensation rung cell amounts shall be adjusted by an amount equivalent to the salary-based apportionment adjustment for administrative and classified staff positions.

(9) A review of a sample of evaluations completed by administrators shall be conducted annually to verify such evaluations are being conducted with fidelity to the state framework for teaching evaluation, including each domain and identification of which domain or domains the administrator is focusing on for the instructional staff or pupil service staff member being evaluated, as outlined in administrative rule. The review shall be completed prior to November 1 of each year. The state board of education shall randomly select a sample of administrators throughout the state. A portion of such administrators’ instructional staff and pupil service staff employee evaluations shall be independently reviewed. The ratio of instructional staff evaluations to pupil service staff evaluations shall be equal to the ratio of the statewide instructional staff salary allowance to pupil service staff salary allowance. The state board of education with input from the Idaho-approved teacher preparation programs and the state department of education shall identify individuals and a process to conduct the reviews. Administrator certificate holders shall be required to participate in ongoing evaluation training pursuant to section 33-1204, Idaho Code. School districts and public charter schools found to have not conducted the evaluations with fidelity to the state framework for teaching evaluation shall not be eligible to receive the leadership premium distribution pursuant to section 33-1002(2), Idaho Code. The state board of education shall report annually the findings of such reviews to the senate education committee, the house of representatives education committee, the state board of education and the deans of Idaho’s approved teacher preparation programs. The state board of education shall promulgate rules implementing the provisions of this subsection.
[(11)](10) School districts shall submit annually to the state the data necessary to determine if an instructional staff or pupil service staff member has met the performance criteria for movement on the applicable compensation rung. Such data shall include the individuals’ performance on each of the performance criteria as defined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code, including the percentage of students meeting their measurable student achievement and student success indicator targets. The department of education shall calculate whether or not instructional staff and pupil service staff have met the compensation rung performance criteria based on the data submitted during the previous five (5) years. Individually identifiable performance evaluation ratings submitted to the state remain part of the employee’s personnel record and are exempt from public disclosure pursuant to section 74-106, Idaho Code.

33-1004C. Base and minimum salaries — Leadership premiums — Education and experience index.

The following shall be reviewed annually by the legislature:

The base salary figures pursuant to subsections (6) and (7) of section 33-1004E, Idaho Code;

The minimum instructional and pupil service staff salary figure pursuant to subsections (1) through (5) of section 33-1004E, Idaho Code; and

The leadership premium figures pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of section 33-1004J, Idaho Code.

The statewide education and experience index (or state average index, or state index) is the average of all qualifying employees, instructional and administrative respectively. It is determined by totaling the index value for all qualifying employees and dividing by the number of employees.

33-1004D. Reporting — Idaho basic educational data system.

For each employee of the school district, a report shall be made in a format prescribed by the state superintendent of public instruction, which shall include sufficient identifying information to provide individual verification, education, teaching experience, and other district employment information. The form shall be filed with the state department of education not later than October 15 of each school year. Provided however, that the department may accept data for instructional employees hired prior to January 1 of each year if the position was advertised as open on the school district website prior to October 15, and no qualified applications were received prior to that date.

33-1004E. District’s salary-based apportionment.

Each district shall be entitled to a salary-based apportionment calculated as provided in this section.

To determine the apportionment for instructional staff, take the amounts indicated on the career ladder table plus the amounts associated with the additional education allocation amounts pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, and calculate the weighted average. The amount so determined shall be multiplied by the district staff allowance for instructional staff determined as provided in section 33-1004(2), Idaho Code. Full-time instructional staff salaries shall be determined from a salary schedule developed by each district and submitted to the state department of education. No full-time instructional staff member or pupil service staff member on the residency compensation rung shall be paid less than the minimum dollar amount on the career ladder residency compensation rung pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, for the applicable fiscal year.

Effective July 1, 2022, no full-time instructional staff member or pupil service staff member on the professional or advanced professional compensation rung shall be paid less than the minimum dollar amount on the career ladder professional compensation rung pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, for the applicable fiscal year.

Effective July 1, 2025, no full-time instructional staff member or pupil service staff member on the advanced professional compensation rung shall be paid less than the minimum dollar amount on the advanced professional compensation rung pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, for the applicable fiscal year.

If an instructional staff member has been certified by the national board for professional teaching standards, the staff member shall receive two thousand dollars ($2,000) per year for five (5) years from the year in which national board certification was earned. The district staff allotment shall be increased by two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each national board-certified instructional staff member who earned national board certification; provided however, that no such awards shall be paid for the period July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, nor shall any liabilities accrue or payments be made pursuant to this section in the future to any individuals who would have otherwise qualified for a payment during this stated time period. The resulting amount is the district’s salary-based apportionment for instructional staff. For purposes of this section, teachers qualifying for the salary increase shall be those who have been recognized as national board-certified teachers as of July 1 of each year.

To determine the apportionment for pupil service staff, take the amounts indicated on the career ladder table plus the amounts associated with the additional education allocation amounts pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, and calculate the weighted average. If the district does not employ any pupil service staff, the district’s pupil service staff average salary shall equal the district’s instructional staff average salary for purposes of calculating pupil service salary-based apportionment. The amount so determined shall be multiplied by the district staff allowance for pupil service staff determined pursuant to section 33-1004(3), Idaho Code. Full-time pupil service staff salaries shall be determined from a salary schedule developed by each district and submitted to the state department of education. The resulting amount is the district’s salary-based apportionment for pupil service staff. No full-time pupil service staff member shall be paid less than the minimum dollar amount on the career ladder residency compensation rung pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, for the applicable fiscal year.
(6) To determine the apportionment for district administrative staff, first determine the district average experience and education index by placing all eligible certificated administrative employees on the statewide index provided in section 33-1004A, Idaho Code. The resulting average is the district index. If the district does not employ any administrative staff, the district administrative index shall equal the statewide average index for purposes of calculating administrative salary-based apportionment. The district administrative staff index shall be multiplied by the base salary of thirty-eight thousand seventeen dollars ($38,017). The amount so determined shall be multiplied by the district staff allowance for administrative staff determined as provided in section 33-1004(4), Idaho Code. The resulting amount is the district’s salary-based apportionment for administrative staff.

To determine the apportionment for district administrative staff, first determine the district average experience and education index by placing all eligible certificated administrative employees on the statewide index provided in section 33-1004A, Idaho Code. The resulting average is the district index. If the district does not employ any administrative staff, the district administrative index shall equal the statewide average index for purposes of calculating administrative salary-based apportionment. The district administrative staff index shall be multiplied by the base salary of thirty-eight thousand seventeen dollars ($38,017). The amount so determined shall be multiplied by the district staff allowance for administrative staff determined as provided in section 33-1004(4), Idaho Code. The resulting amount is the district’s salary-based apportionment for administrative staff.

To determine the apportionment for classified staff, multiply twenty-two thousand seven hundred sixty-one dollars ($22,761) by the district classified staff allowance determined as provided in section 33-1004(5), Idaho Code. The amount so determined is the district’s apportionment for classified staff.

The district’s salary-based apportionment shall be the sum of the apportionments calculated in subsections (1), (4), (5), (6) and (7) of this section, plus the benefit apportionment as provided in section 33-1004F, Idaho Code.

33-1004F. Obligations to retirement and social security benefits.

Based upon the actual salary-based apportionment, as determined in section 33-1004E, Idaho Code, the master educator premiums distributed pursuant to section 33-1004I, Idaho Code, and the leadership premiums distributed pursuant to section 33-1004J, Idaho Code, there shall be allocated that amount required to meet the employer’s obligations to the public employee retirement system and to social security.

33-1004G. Early retirement incentive

Administrative staff excluded. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 97, § 1, effective March 21, 2013.

33-1004H. Employing retired teachers and administrators.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33-514, 33-1271 or 33-1273, Idaho Code, school districts may employ school resource officers, certificated schoolteachers, and administrators who are receiving retirement benefits from the public employee retirement system of Idaho, except those who received benefits under the early retirement program previously provided by the state in positions requiring such certification, as at-will employees. Any employment contract between the retiree and the school district shall be separate and apart from the collective bargaining agreement of the school district.

Retirees employed under this section shall accrue one (1) day per month of sick leave, with no annual sick leave accumulation unless additional sick leave is negotiated between the candidate and the school district at the time of employment. No sick leave accrued under this section qualifies for unused sick leave benefits under section 33-1228, Idaho Code.

School districts are not required to provide health insurance or life insurance benefits to persons employed under this section. Post-termination benefits may be negotiated between the school district and the certificated employee at the time of rehiring but in no event can the parties affect or attempt to affect the provisions governing the public employee retirement system.

33-1004I. Master educator premiums. [Effective until July 1, 2024 — See subsection (8)].

A portion of the moneys available to the education support program shall be distributed per full-time equivalent instructional staff position employed by each school district. Such moneys shall be paid to instructional staff employees who have been awarded a master educator premium prior to June 30, 2021, and have earned a master educator designation by meeting the minimum qualifications set forth in subsection (2) of this section and the additional qualifications developed or adopted by the employing school district pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, in an amount set forth in subsection (4) of this section. No new applications shall be accepted for any year after January 1, 2021.

The minimum qualifications for an instructional staff or a pupil service staff employee to earn a master educator designation shall be as follows:

An instructional staff or pupil service staff employee must have eight (8) or more years of teaching experience provided that the three (3) years immediately preceding the award must be continuous and in Idaho. The remainder of the teaching experience making up the eight (8) years must have been earned in Idaho or in a compact-member state pursuant to section 33-4101, Idaho Code;

An instructional staff or pupil service staff employee must demonstrate mastery of instructional techniques for no fewer than three (3) of the previous five (5) years of instruction through:

Artifacts demonstrating evidence of effective teaching; and

Successful completion of an annual individualized professional learning plan; and

A majority of an instructional staff employee’s students must meet measurable student achievement as defined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code, for no fewer than three (3) of the previous five (5) years.

A majority of a pupil service staff employee’s students must meet measurable student achievement or measurable student success indicators, as defined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code, for no fewer than three (3) of the previous five (5) years.

In addition to the minimum qualifications for a master educator designation set forth in subsection (2) of this section:

Local school districts may develop and require additional qualifications showing demonstrated mastery of instructional techniques and professional practice through multiple measures, provided that such qualifications shall be developed by a committee consisting of teachers, administrators and other school district stakeholders and shall first be approved by the state board of education;

Local school districts may develop plans that recognize groups of teachers based on measurable student achievement goals aligned with school district-approved continuous improvement plans. Groups may be school-wide or may be smaller groups such as grade levels or by subject matter. Each teacher in a master educator group shall receive a master educator premium if goals are met according to the district plans. Plans shall be developed by a committee consisting of teachers, administrators and other school district stakeholders and shall first be approved by the state board of education. Any school district that does not follow their preapproved plan shall not receive future master educator premium dollars; or
(c) If a local school district has not developed qualifications pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, then eligible school district staff may apply to the state board of education by showing demonstrated mastery of instructional techniques and professional practice through multiple measures as developed by a committee facilitated by the state board of education consisting of teachers, administrators and other stakeholders, which measures shall be approved by the state board of education.

The amount of the master educator premium paid to a qualified instructional staff or pupil service staff employee shall be four thousand dollars ($4,000) each year for three (3) years starting with the initial award of the master educator premium.

Local school district boards of trustees may provide master educator premiums to instructional staff employees consistent with the provisions of this section.

For the purposes of this section, the term “school district” also means “public charter school” and the term “board of trustees” also means “board of directors.”

The state board of education may promulgate rules implementing the provisions of this section.

The provisions of this section shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2024.

33-1004J. Leadership premiums.

Of the moneys available to the educational support program, eight hundred fifty dollars ($850) shall be distributed per full-time equivalent instructional and pupil service staff position employed by each school district. Such moneys shall be paid to instructional and pupil service staff employees for leadership activities as provided in paragraphs (a) through (h) of this subsection. Such premiums shall be valid only for the fiscal year for which the premiums are made and shall be made for one (1) or more of the following reasons identified as leadership priorities by a committee consisting of teachers, administrators and other school district stakeholders and shall be approved by the board of trustees:

Teaching a course in which students earn both high school and college credit;

Teaching a course to middle school students in which the students earn both middle school and high school credit;

Holding and providing service in multiple nonadministrative certificate or subject endorsement areas;

Serving or being hired to serve in an instructional or pupil service position designated as hard to fill by the board of trustees;

Serving or being hired to serve in a hard to fill instructional position in a career technical education program;

Providing mentoring, peer assistance or professional development pursuant to section 33-512(17), Idaho Code;

Having received professional development in career and academic counseling, and then providing career or academic counseling for students, with such services incorporated within or provided in addition to the teacher’s regular classroom instructional or pupil service duties;

Other leadership duties designated by the board of trustees, exclusive of duties related to student activities or athletics. Such duties shall require that the employee work additional time as a condition of the receipt of a leadership premium.

Local school district boards of trustees shall provide leadership premiums to instructional or pupil service staff employees consistent with the provisions of this section and may not distribute moneys provided pursuant to this section unless employees meet one (1) of the criteria specified in subsection (1) of this section. The decision as to whom and how many receive leadership premiums, and in what amounts, shall not be subject to collective bargaining, any other provision of law notwithstanding. A board may provide multiple leadership premiums to an instructional or pupil service staff employee. However, no such employee shall receive cumulative leadership premiums in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) of the minimum salary as designated on the career ladder pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, nor less than nine hundred dollars ($900), regardless of such employees full- or part-time status.

The state department of education may require reports of information as needed to implement the provisions of this section. At a minimum, school districts shall report the information necessary for the department to fulfill the provisions of this section. The department shall report, on or before January 15 each year, to the governor, the senate education committee and the house of representatives education committee relevant information regarding leadership premiums, including the following:

The number of instructional and pupil service staff employees in the district;

The number of instructional and pupil service staff employees that received a leadership premium;

The number of leadership premiums issued, by district;

The average dollar amount of leadership premiums issued, by district;

The highest and lowest leadership premium issued, by district;

The percent of instructional and pupil service staff positions receiving leadership premiums and the cumulative amount of such premiums, by district; and

The reasons identified as leadership priorities approved by the board of trustees as listed in subsection (1) of this section, including a description of the other leadership duties designated by the board of trustees as provided in subsection (1)(h) of this section and the number of the premiums awarded per leadership activity as identified in subsection (1)(a) through (h) of this section.

For the purposes of this section, the term “school district” also means “public charter school,” and the term “board of trustees” also means “board of directors.”

The state board of education is hereby authorized to promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

33-1005. Districts receiving federal funds.

In school districts which receive moneys for the maintenance and operation of the schools from agencies of the federal government, the educational support program shall be computed on the basis of the average daily attendance of pupils as set forth in this chapter and without regard to the manner in which such allowance from the federal government may be computed.